West Virginia, session 2026, SB314.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Department of Agriculture. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §19-1-4 of this code, modified by the Department of Agriculture to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 24, 2025, relating to the Department of Agriculture (public markets, 61 CSR 11), is authorized.